Utah statutes.
73-3b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Artificially recharge" means to place water in an aquifer:

(a)  by means of:

(i)  injection;

(ii)  surface infiltration; or

(iii)  another method; and

(b)  for the purposes of:

(i)  storing the water; and

(ii)  recovering the water.

(2)  "Division" means Division of Water Rights.

(3)  "Recharge permit" means a permit issued by the state engineer to construct and operate a recharge project.

(4)  "Recharge project" means to artificially recharge water into an aquifer.

(5)  "Recovery permit" means a permit issued by the state engineer to construct and operate a recovery project.

(6)  "Recovery project" means to withdraw from an aquifer water that has been artificially recharged pursuant to a recharge permit.



Amended by Chapter 107, 2010 General Session

